Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-831
Peace officer, defined.

As used in sections 29-830 to 29-835, unless the context otherwise requires:

All state, county, city and village officers and their agents and employees, charged by statute or municipal ordinance with powers or duties involving inspection of real or personal property, building premises and contents, including but not limited by enumeration to housing, electrical, plumbing, heating, gas, fire, health, food, zoning, pollution, water, and weights and measures inspections, shall be peace officers for the purpose of applying for, obtaining and executing inspection warrants.

Laws 1969, c. 231, § 2, p. 859.